Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.183

Farming.

"Farming" means the cultivation and tillage of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or horticultural commodities (except forestry or forestry operations), the raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or poultry, and any practices performed on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with such farming operations.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 281 s 59.]